North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 19A. Mortgage Lending Act. [Repealed]

§§ 53-243.01 through 53-243.18.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-374, s. 1, effective July 31, 2009, and applicable to all applications for licensure as a mortgage loan originator, mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage servicer filed on or after that date.

§ 53-244.

Reserved for future codification purposes.